Florida, session 2026, SB1326.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 775.027, Florida Statutes, is amended to 17 read: 18 775.027âInsanity defense.â 19 (1)âAFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE.âAll persons are presumed to be 20 sane. It is an affirmative defense to a criminal prosecution 21 that, at the time of the commission of the acts constituting the 22 offense, the defendant was insane. Insanity is established when 23 the defendant had a mental infirmity, disease, or defect and 24 because of this condition, the defendant did not know what he or 25 she was doing or its consequences.: 26 (a)âThe defendant had a mental infirmity, disease, or 27 defect; and 28 (b)âBecause of this condition, the defendant: 29 1.âDid not know what he or she was doing or its 30 consequences; or 31 2.âAlthough the defendant knew what he or she was doing and 32 its consequences, the defendant did not know that what he or she 33 was doing was wrong. 34 35 Mental infirmity, disease, or defect does not constitute a 36 defense of insanity except as provided in this subsection. 37 (2)âBURDEN OF PROOF.âThe defendant has the burden of 38 proving the defense of insanity by clear and convincing 39 evidence. 40 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 916.12, Florida 41 Statutes, is amended to read: 42 916.12âMental competence to proceed.â 43 (3)âIn considering the issue of competence to proceed, an 44 examining expert shall first consider and specifically include 45 in his or her report the defendantâs capacity to: 46 (a)âAppreciate the charges or allegations against the 47 defendant. 48 (b)âAppreciate the range and nature of possible penalties, 49 if applicable, that may be imposed in the proceedings against 50 the defendant. 51 (c)âUnderstand the adversarial nature of the legal process. 52 (d)âDisclose to counsel facts pertinent to the proceedings 53 at issue. 54 (e)âManifest appropriate courtroom behavior. 55 (f)âTestify relevantly. 56 57 In addition, an examining expert shall consider and include in 58 his or her report whether the expert finds that the defendant is 59 malingering, what instrument or method was used as the basis for 60 any such finding, and any other factor deemed relevant by the 61 expert. 62 Section 3.âSection 916.145, Florida Statutes, is amended to 63 read: 64 916.145âDismissal of charges.â 65 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), the charges 66 against a defendant adjudicated incompetent to proceed due to 67 mental illness may not shall be dismissed unless: without 68 prejudice to the state if 69 (a)âThe defendant remains incompetent to proceed for a 70 duration of time equal to the maximum statutory sentence for 71 such charges; and 72 (b)âThe maximum statutory sentence for such charges is more 73 than 5 years. 74 (2)âIf the defendantâs maximum statutory sentence is equal 75 to or less than 5 years, 5 continuous, uninterrupted years after 76 such determination, unless the court in its order specifies its 77 reasons for believing that the defendant will become competent 78 to proceed within the foreseeable future and specifies the time 79 within which the defendant is expected to become competent to 80 proceed. the court may dismiss such charges at least 3 years 81 after such determination of incompetency, unless the charge is: 82 (a)âArson; 83 (b)âSexual battery; 84 (c)âRobbery; 85 (d)âKidnapping; 86 (e)âAggravated child abuse; 87 (f)âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled 88 adult; 89 (g)âAggravated assault with a deadly weapon; 90 (h)âMurder; 91 (i)âManslaughter; 92 (j)âAggravated manslaughter of an elderly person or 93 disabled adult; 94 (k)âAggravated manslaughter of a child; 95 (l)âUnlawful throwing, projecting, placing, or discharging 96 of a destructive device or bomb; 97 (m)âArmed burglary; 98 (n)âAggravated battery; 99 (o)âAggravated stalking; 100 (p)âA forcible felony as defined in s. 776.08 and not 101 listed elsewhere in this subsection; 102 (q)âAn offense where an element of the offense requires the 103 possession, use, or discharge of a firearm; 104 (r)âAn attempt to commit an offense listed in this 105 subsection; 106 (s)âAn offense allegedly committed by a defendant who has 107 had a forcible or violent felony conviction within the 5 years 108 immediately preceding the date of arrest for the nonviolent 109 felony sought to be dismissed; 110 (t)âAn offense allegedly committed by a defendant who, 111 after having been found incompetent and placed under court 112 supervision in a community-based program, is formally charged by 113 a state attorney or the Office of the Statewide Prosecutor with 114 a new felony offense; or 115 (u)âAn offense for which there is an identifiable victim 116 and such victim has not consented to the dismissal. 117 (3)(2)âThis section does not prohibit the state from 118 refiling dismissed charges if the defendant is declared to be 119 competent to proceed in the future. 120 Section 4.âSection 916.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 121 read: 122 916.15âInvoluntary commitment of defendant adjudicated not 123 guilty by reason of insanity.â 124 (1)âThe determination of whether a defendant is not guilty 125 by reason of insanity shall be determined in accordance with s. 126 775.027 and the applicable Rule 3.217, Florida Rules of Criminal 127 Procedure. 128 (2)âA defendant who is acquitted of criminal charges 129 because of a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity shall 130 may be involuntarily committed pursuant to such finding if the 131 defendant has a mental illness and, because of the illness, is 132 manifestly dangerous to himself or herself or others. 133 (3)(a)âEvery defendant acquitted of criminal charges by 134 reason of insanity and found to meet the criteria for 135 involuntary commitment shall may be committed and treated in 136 accordance with the provisions of this section and the 137 applicable Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure. 138 (b)âImmediately after receipt of a completed copy of the 139 court commitment order containing all documentation required by 140 the applicable Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure, the 141 department shall request all medical information relating to the 142 defendant from the jail. The jail shall provide the department 143 with all medical information relating to the defendant within 3 144 business days after receipt of the departmentâs request or at 145 the time the defendant enters the physical custody of the 146 department, whichever is earlier. 147 (c)âThe department shall admit a defendant so adjudicated 148 to an appropriate facility or program for treatment and shall 149 retain and treat such defendant. No later than 6 months after 150 the date of admission, prior to the end of any period of 151 extended commitment, or at any time that the administrator or 152 his or her designee determines that the defendant no longer 153 meets the criteria for continued commitment placement, the 154 administrator or designee shall file a report with the court 155 pursuant to the applicable Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure. 156 (4)âIn all proceedings under this section, both the 157 defendant and the state shall have the right to a hearing before 158 the committing court. Evidence at such hearing may be presented 159 by the hospital administrator or the administratorâs designee as 160 well as by the state and the defendant. The defendant shall have 161 the right to counsel at any such hearing. In the event that a 162 defendant is determined to be indigent pursuant to s. 27.52, the 163 public defender shall represent the defendant. The parties shall 164 have access to the defendantâs records at the treating 165 facilities and may interview or depose personnel who have had 166 contact with the defendant at the treating facilities. 167 (5)âThe commitment hearing shall be held within 30 days 168 after the court receives notification that the defendant no 169 longer meets the criteria for continued commitment. The 170 defendant must be transported to the committing courtâs 171 jurisdiction for the hearing. Each defendant returning to a jail 172 shall continue to receive the same psychotropic medications as 173 prescribed by the facility physician at the time of discharge 174 from a forensic or civil facility, unless the jail physician 175 determines there is a compelling medical reason to change or 176 discontinue the medication for the health and safety of the 177 defendant. If the jail physician changes or discontinues the 178 medication and the defendant is later determined at the 179 competency hearing to be incompetent to stand trial and is 180 recommitted to the department, the jail physician may not change 181 or discontinue the defendantâs prescribed psychotropic 182 medication upon the defendantâs next discharge from the forensic 183 or civil facility. 184 Section 5.âSection 921.0026, Florida Statutes, is amended 185 to read: 186 921.0026âMitigating circumstances.âThis section applies to 187 any felony offense, except any capital felony, committed on or 188 after October 1, 1998. 189 (1)âA downward departure from the lowest permissible 190 sentence, as calculated according to the total sentence points 191 pursuant to s. 921.0024, is prohibited unless there are 192 circumstances or factors that reasonably justify the downward 193 departure. Mitigating factors to be considered include, but are 194 not limited to, those listed in subsection (2). The imposition 195 of a sentence below the lowest permissible sentence is subject 196 to appellate review under chapter 924, but the extent of 197 downward departure is not subject to appellate review. 198 (2)âMitigating circumstances under which a departure from 199 the lowest permissible sentence is reasonably justified include, 200 but are not limited to: 201 (a)âThe departure results from a legitimate, uncoerced plea 202 bargain. 203 (b)âThe defendant was an accomplice to the offense and was 204 a relatively minor participant in the criminal conduct. 205 (c)âThe capacity of the defendant to appreciate the 206 criminal nature of the conduct or to conform that conduct to the 207 requirements of law was substantially impaired. 208 (d)1.âThe defendant requires specialized treatment for a: 209 a.âSevere physical disability; or 210 b.âSevere and persistent mental illness that is unrelated 211 to substance abuse or addiction, and has been diagnosed by a 212 qualified professional, as that term is defined in s. 39.01. The 213 court may not depart from the lowest permissible sentence under 214 this subparagraph if the defendant is a danger to himself or 215 herself or others, or is convicted of murder, manslaughter, or 216 any offense listed in s. 943.0435. 217 2.âThis paragraph may not be construed to allow a convicted 218 defendant to receive outpatient therapy in lieu of a term of 219 incarceration. mental disorder that is unrelated to substance 220 abuse or addiction or for a physical disability, and the 221 defendant is amenable to treatment. 222 (e)âThe need for payment of restitution to the victim 223 outweighs the need for a prison sentence. 224 (f)âThe victim was an initiator, willing participant, 225 aggressor, or provoker of the incident. 226 (g)âThe defendant acted under extreme duress or under the 227 domination of another person. 228 (h)âBefore the identity of the defendant was determined, 229 the victim was substantially compensated. 230 (i)âThe defendant cooperated with the state to resolve the 231 current offense or any other offense. 232 (j)âThe offense was committed in an unsophisticated manner 233 and was an isolated incident for which the defendant has shown 234 remorse. 235 (k)âAt the time of the offense the defendant was too young 236 to appreciate the consequences of the offense. 237 (l)âThe defendant is to be sentenced as a youthful 238 offender. 239 (m)âThe defendantâs offense is a nonviolent felony, the 240 defendantâs Criminal Punishment Code scoresheet total sentence 241 points under s. 921.0024 are 60 points or fewer, and the court 242 determines that the defendant is amenable to the services of a 243 postadjudicatory treatment-based drug court program and is 244 otherwise qualified to participate in the program as part of the 245 sentence. For purposes of this paragraph, the term ânonviolent 246 felonyâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 948.08(6). 247 (n)âThe defendant was making a good faith effort to obtain 248 or provide medical assistance for an individual experiencing a 249 drug-related overdose. 250 (3)âExcept as provided in paragraph (2)(m), the defendantâs 251 substance abuse or addiction, including intoxication at the time 252 of the offense, is not a mitigating factor under subsection (2) 253 and does not, under any circumstances, justify a downward 254 departure from the permissible sentencing range. 255 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.